Texas, session 892, SB47.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Section 15.531(2), Water Code, as amended by S.B. 1967, Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, and effective September 1, 2025, is amended to read as follows: (2)  "Flood project" means a drainage, flood mitigation, or flood control project, including: (A)  planning and design activities; (B)  work to obtain regulatory approval to provide nonstructural and structural flood mitigation and drainage; (C)  construction of structural flood mitigation and drainage infrastructure; (D)  construction and implementation of nonstructural projects, including projects that use nature-based features to protect, mitigate, or reduce flood risk; [and] (E)  construction of multi-purpose flood mitigation and drainage infrastructure projects that control, divert, capture, or impound floodwater, stormwater, agricultural runoff water, or treated wastewater effluent and treat and distribute the water for the purpose of creating an additional source of water supply; and (F)  acquisition from willing sellers of primary residences that are: (i)  located in a 100-year floodplain; and (ii)  owned by individuals whose total annual household income is less than 200 percent of the federal poverty level. SECTION 2.  Section 15.534, Water Code, is amended by adding Subsection (e) to read as follows: (e)  Subsection (c) does not apply to a flood project described by Section 15.531(2)(F). SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.